New Jersey, session 222, S1398.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Childrens System of Care in the Department of Children and Families shall ensure that once an individual up to the age of 21 with a developmental disability has been authorized to receive services from an agency contracted with the division to provide family support services, the family or guardian of the individual shall be allowed to set aside any amount of unused agency- after school care service hours, offered by the same agency contracted with the division to provide after school care to the individual, for use during holiday and weekend hours. b. As used in this section, agency-after school care means social and recreational experiences provided by a community-based agency contracted with the Division of Childrens System of Care to an individual up to the age of 21 with a developmental disability during after school hours and outside of the individuals home. 2.  The Department of Children and Families shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.